Hawaii statutes.
§46-105 Collection of tax increments.
(a) The county by ordinance shall provide for the allocation of real property
taxes and tax increments in the manner required by this part.

(b) If a county exercises the power allowed
under this part, then commencing with the first payment of real property taxes
levied by the county subsequent to the time a tax increment district takes
effect, receipts from real property taxes shall be allocated and paid over as
follows:

(1) The amount of real property tax produced from the
assessment base shall be paid to the county general fund; and

(2) The tax increments produced from the assessment
increment in the tax increment district shall be applied as follows:

(A) First, an amount equal to the installment
of (i) principal and interest falling due of any tax increment bonds, or (ii)
any project cost approved by the county, shall be deposited into the tax
increment fund established for the tax increment district.

(B) Second, an amount equal to the adjustment
rate times the amount of real property tax produced from the assessment base
shall be computed and paid to the county general fund.

(C) Third, the remaining amount of tax
increments, if any, shall be deposited into the tax increment fund established
for the tax increment district.

(c) The allocation of real property taxes
pursuant to this part shall in no way limit the power of the county under
section 47-12 to levy ad valorem taxes without limitation as to rate or amount
on all real property subject to taxation by the county for the payment of the
principal and interest of its general obligation bonds. [L 1985, c 267, pt of
§1; am L 1990, c 34, §5]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next